Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.590

Building construction projects—County prohibited from requiring state agencies or local governments to provide bond or other security as a condition for issuance of permit.

A county legislative authority may not require any state agency or unit of local government to secure the performance of a permit requirement with a surety bond or other financial security device, including cash or assigned account, as a condition of issuing a permit to that unit of local government for a building construction project.

As used in this section, "building construction project" includes, in addition to its usual meaning, associated landscaping, street alteration, pedestrian or vehicular access alteration, or other amenities or alterations necessarily associated with the project.

[ 1993 c 439 s 3.]